North Carolina statutes. Chapter 127B. Military Affairs.
Article 2. Discrimination Against Military Personnel.

§ 127B-10.
Purpose.

The General Assembly finds and declares that military personnel in North Carolina vitally affect the general economy of this State and that it is in the public interest and public welfare to ensure that no discrimination against military personnel is practiced by any business.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1.

§ 127B-11.
Private discrimination prohibited.

No person shall discriminate against any officer, warrant officer or enlisted person of the military forces of the State or of the United States because of their membership therein. No member of these military forces shall be prejudiced or injured by any person, employer, officer or agent of any corporation, company or firm with respect to their employment, position or status or denied or disqualified for employment by virtue of their membership or service in the military forces of this State or of the United States.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 92.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 92, effective June 20, 2011, deleted “or naval” following “military” in the first sentence.

§ 127B-12.
Public discrimination prohibited.

No officer or employee of the State, or of any county, city and county, municipal corporation, school district, water district, or other district shall discriminate against any officer, warrant officer or enlisted person of the military forces of the State or of the United States because of their membership therein. No member of the military forces shall be prejudiced or injured by any officer or employee of the State, or of any county, city and county, municipal corporation, school district, water district, or other district with respect to their employment, appointment, position or status or denied or disqualified for or discharged from their employment or position by virtue of their membership or service in the military forces of this State or of the United States.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 93.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 93, effective June 20, 2011, deleted “or naval” following “military” in the first sentence.

§ 127B-13.
Refusing entrance prohibited.

No person shall prohibit or refuse entrance to any officer, warrant officer or enlisted person of the military forces of this State or of the United States into any public place of entertainment, of amusement, or accommodation because the officer or enlisted person is wearing the uniform of the organization to which they belong or because of their membership or service in the military forces of this State or of the United States.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 94.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 94, effective June 20, 2011, deleted “or naval” following the first occurrence of “military.”

§ 127B-14.
Employer discrimination prohibited.

No employer or officer or agent of any corporation, company, or firm, or other person shall discharge any person from employment because of the performance of any emergency military duty by reason of being an officer, warrant officer or enlisted person of the military forces of this State or the United States.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 95.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 95, effective June 20, 2011, deleted “or naval” following the last occurrence of “military.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Employment Law After Coman: Reaffirming Basic Rights in the Workplace,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 905 (1989).

§ 127B-15.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of this Article shall be deemed guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Each violation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

History.

1985, c. 522, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 941; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Employment Law After Coman: Reaffirming Basic Rights in the Workplace,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 905 (1989).

§§ 127B-16 through 127B-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.